California statutes. Insurance Code
Before an insurer may pay the proceeds of any contract of life or disability insurance to any undertaker or funeral director, as beneficiary or assignee, for funeral services, it shall require proof satisfactory to it that the services have been rendered. If proof of rendition of services is not furnished within thirty days after demand is made upon an insurer for such payment and in any event within one year from the date of the insured’s death, the insurer shall pay the proceeds of such insurance to any contingent or other beneficiary designated in the policy, and if no contingent or other beneficiary is so designated, to the estate of the insured or to any person, other than to such undertaker or funeral director, equitably entitled to all or any portion of the proceeds by reason of having incurred expense or furnished funeral services for the insured, to the extent of the expense incurred or services furnished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 727.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.

When a payment is made equal to the full first premium at the time an application for life insurance other than group life insurance is signed by the applicant and either (1) the applicant received at that time a receipt for said payment on a form prepared by the insurer, or (2) in the absence of such a receipt the insurer receives the said payment at its home office, branch office, or the office of one of its general agencies, and in either case the insurer, pursuant to its regular underwriting practices and standards, approves the application for the issuance by it of a policy of life insurance on the plan and for the class of risk and amount of insurance applied for, and the person to be insured dies on or after the date of the application, on or after the date of the medical examination, if any, or on or after any date specially requested in the application for the policy to take effect, whichever is later, but before such policy is issued and delivered, the insurer shall pay such amount as would have been due under the terms of the policy in the same manner and subject to the same rights, conditions and defenses as if such policy had been issued and delivered on the date the application was signed by the applicant. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit an insurer from limiting the maximum amount for which it may be liable prior to actual issuance and delivery of the policy of life insurance either to (1) an amount not less than its established maximum retention, or to (2) fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), if a statement to this effect is included in the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

10116.

No group life insurance policy or disability insurance policy shall be issued or delivered in this State where the premiums or any part thereof is paid or is to be paid in whole or in part by an employer pursuant to the terms of a collective bargaining agreement unless the policy provides that in the event of a cessation of work by the employees covered by the policy as the result of a labor dispute the policy, upon timely payment of the premium, shall continue in effect with respect to all employees insured by the policy on the date of the cessation of work who continue to pay their individual contribution, and who assume and pay the contribution due from the employer, for the period of cessation of work, under the following conditions:

(a) If the policyholder is not a trustee or the trustees of a fund established or maintained in whole or in part by the employer, the policy shall provide that the employee’s individual contribution shall be the rate in the policy, on the date cessation of work occurs, applicable to an individual in the class to which the employee belongs as set forth in the policy. If the policy does not provide for a rate applicable to individuals, the policy shall provide that the employee’s individual contribution shall be an amount equal to the amount determined by dividing (1) the total monthly premium in effect under the policy at the date of cessation of work by (2) the total number of persons insured under the policy at such date.

(b) If the policyholder is a trustee or the trustees of a fund established or maintained in whole or in part by the employer, the employee’s contribution shall be the amount which he and his employer would have been required to contribute to the trust for such employee if (1) the cessation of work had not occurred and (2) the agreement requiring the employer to make contributions to the trust were in full force.

(c) The policy may provide that the continuation of insurance is contingent upon the collection of individual contributions by the union or unions representing the employees for policies referred to in subdivision (a) above, and by the policyholder or the policyholder’s agent with respect to policies referred to in subdivision (b) above.

(d) The policy may provide that the continuation of insurance on each employee is contingent upon timely payment of contributions by the individual and timely payment of the premium by the entity responsible for collecting the individual contributions.

(e) The policy may provide that each individual premium rate shall be increased by any amount up to twenty percent (20%), or any higher percent which may be approved by the commissioner, of that otherwise shown in the policy during the period of cessation of work in order to provide sufficient compensation to the insurer to cover increased administrative costs and increased mortality and morbidity. If the policy does provide for such an increase, this shall have the effect of increasing the employee’s contribution by a like percent.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit any right which the insurer may have in accordance with the terms of the policy to increase or decrease the premium rates before, during or after such cessation of work if, in fact, the insurer would have had the right to increase the premium rate had the cessation of work not occurred. If such a premium rate change is made, it shall be effective, notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, on such date as the insurer shall determine in accordance with the terms of the policy.

(g) The policy may contain such other provisions with respect to such continuation of insurance as the commissioner may approve.

(h) The policy may provide that, if a premium is unpaid at the date of cessation of work and such premium became due prior to such cessation of work, the continuation of insurance is contingent upon payment of such premium prior to the date the next premium becomes due under the terms of the policy.

Nothing herein shall be deemed to require the continuation of any loss of time payments included in any such group disability policy, nor of any other coverages beyond the time that seventy-five percent (75%) of the employees continue such coverage or as to any individual employee beyond the time that he takes full-time employment with another employer; nor shall anything herein be deemed to require continuation of coverage more than six (6) months after the cessation of work.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as modifying or in any way affecting the operation and effect of the provisions of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2097.)
-------------------------------------------

10116.5.

(a) Every policy of disability insurance that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1999, that provides hospital, medical, or surgical expense coverage under an employer-sponsored group plan for an employer subject to COBRA, as defined in subdivision (e), or an employer group for which the disability insurer is required to offer Cal-COBRA coverage, as defined in subdivision (f), including a carrier providing replacement coverage under Section 10128.3, shall further offer the former employee the opportunity to continue benefits as required under subdivision (b), and shall further offer the former spouse of an employee or former employee the opportunity to continue benefits as required under subdivision
 (c).

(b) (1) If a former employee worked for the employer for at least five years prior to the date of termination of employment and is 60 years of age or older on the date employment ends is entitled to and so elects to continue benefits under COBRA or Cal-COBRA for himself or herself and for any spouse, the employee or spouse may further continue benefits beyond the date coverage under COBRA or Cal-COBRA ends, as set forth in paragraph (2). Except as otherwise specified in this section, continuation coverage shall be under the same benefit terms and conditions as if the continuation coverage under COBRA or Cal-COBRA had remained in force. For the employee or spouse, continuation coverage following the end of COBRA or Cal-COBRA is subject to payment of premiums to the insurer. Individuals ineligible for COBRA or Cal-COBRA or who are eligible but have not elected or exhausted continuation coverage under federal COBRA or
 Cal-COBRA are not entitled to continuation coverage under this section. Premiums for continuation coverage under this section shall be billed by, and remitted to, the insurer in accordance with subdivision (d). Failure to pay the requisite premiums may result in termination of the continuation coverage in accordance with the applicable provisions in the insurer’s group contract with the employer.

(2) The employer shall notify the former employee or spouse or both, or the former spouse of the employee or former employee, of the availability of the continuation benefits under this section in accordance with Section 2800.2 of the Labor Code. To continue health care coverage pursuant to this section, the individual shall elect to do so by notifying the insurer in writing within 30 calendar days prior to the date continuation coverage under COBRA or Cal-COBRA is scheduled to end. Every disability insurer shall provide to the employer replacing a
 group benefit plan policy issued by the insurer, or to the employer’s agent or broker representative, within 15 days of any written request, information in possession of the insurer reasonably required to administer the requirements of Section 2800.2 of the Labor Code.

(3) The continuation coverage shall end automatically on the earlier of (A) the date the individual reaches age 65, (B) the date the individual is covered under any group health plan not maintained by the employer or any other insurer or health care service plan, regardless of whether that coverage is less valuable, (C) the date the individual becomes entitled to Medicare under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, (D) for a spouse, five years from the date on which continuation coverage under COBRA or Cal-COBRA was scheduled to end for the spouse, or (E) the date on which the employer terminates its group contract with the insurer and ceases to provide coverage for any active
 employees through that insurer, in which case the insurer shall notify the former employee or spouse, or both, of the right to a conversion policy.

(c) (1) If a former spouse of an employee or former employee was covered as a qualified beneficiary under COBRA or Cal-COBRA, the former spouse may further continue benefits beyond the date coverage under COBRA or Cal-COBRA ends, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). Except as otherwise specified in this section, continuation coverage shall be under the same benefit terms and conditions as if the continuation coverage under COBRA or Cal-COBRA had remained in force. Continuation coverage following the end of COBRA or Cal-COBRA is subject to payment of premiums to the insurer. Premiums for continuation coverage under this section shall be billed by, and remitted to, the insurer in accordance with subdivision (d). Failure to pay the requisite premiums may result in
 termination of the continuation coverage in accordance with the applicable provisions in the insurer’s group contract with the employer or former employer.

(2) The continuation coverage for the former spouse shall end automatically on the earlier of (A) the date the individual reaches 65 years of age, (B) the date the individual is covered under any group health plan not maintained by the employer or any other health care service plan or insurer, regardless of whether that coverage is less valuable, (C) the date the individual becomes entitled to Medicare under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, (D) five years from the date on which continuation coverage under COBRA or Cal-COBRA was scheduled to end for the former spouse, or (E) the date on which the employer or former employer terminates its group contract with the insurer and ceases to provide coverage for any active employees through that insurer.

(d) (1) If the premium charged to the employer for a specific employee or dependent eligible under this section is adjusted for the age of the specific employee, or eligible dependent, on other than a composite basis, the rate for continuation coverage under this section shall not exceed 102 percent of the premium charged by the insurer to the employer for an employee of the same age as the former employee electing continuation coverage in the case of an individual who was eligible for COBRA, and 110 percent in the case of an individual who was eligible for Cal-COBRA. If the coverage continued is that of a former spouse, the premium charged shall not exceed 102 percent of the premium charged by the plan to the employer for an employee of the same age as the former spouse selecting continuation coverage in the case of an individual who was eligible for COBRA, and 110 percent in the case of an individual who was eligible for
 Cal-COBRA.

(2) If the premium charged to the employer for a specific employee or dependent eligible under this section is not adjusted for age of the specific employee, or eligible dependent, then the rate for continuation coverage under this section shall not exceed 213 percent of the applicable current group rate. For purposes of this section, the “applicable current group rate” means the total premiums charged by the insurer for coverage for the group, divided by the relevant number of covered persons.

(3) However, in computing the premiums charged to the specific employer group, the insurer shall not include consideration of the specific medical care expenditures for beneficiaries receiving continuation coverage pursuant to this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, “COBRA” means Section 4980B of Title 26,
 Section 1161 and following of Title 29, and Section 300bb of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (Public Law 99-272), and as amended.

(f) For purposes of this section, “Cal-COBRA” means the continuation coverage that must be offered pursuant to Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 10128.50), or Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 1366.20) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “former spouse” means either an individual who is divorced from an employee or former employee or an individual who was married to an employee or former employee at the time of the death of the employee or former employee.

(h) Every group benefit plan evidence of coverage that is issued, amended, or renewed after
 January 1, 1999, shall contain a description of the provisions and eligibility requirements for the continuation coverage offered pursuant to this section.

(i) This section does not apply to any individual who is not eligible for its continuation coverage prior to January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 441, Sec. 13.   (AB 1180)   Effective October 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10117.

(a) A policy of disability insurance, self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, or nonprofit hospital service plan may not provide an exception for other coverage where the other coverage is entitlement to Medi-Cal benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14500) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or medicaid benefits under Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code. Each policy of disability insurance shall be interpreted not to provide an exception for those Medi-Cal or medicaid benefits.

(b) A policy of disability insurance may not provide that the benefits payable thereunder are subject to reduction if the individual insured has entitlement to such Medi-Cal benefits.

(c) A policy of disability insurance, self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, or nonprofit hospital service plan shall not provide an exception for enrollment for benefits because of an applicant’s entitlement to Medi-Cal benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14500) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or medicaid benefits under Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 147, Sec. 10.   Effective July 11, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10117.5.

No disability insurer contract that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on and after January 1, 2002, shall contain a provision that prohibits or restricts any health facilities’ compliance with the requirements of Section 1262.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 691, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10117.52.

(a) No health insurance contract in existence or issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2013, between a health insurer and a provider or a supplier shall prohibit, condition, or in any way restrict the disclosure of claims data related to health care services provided to a policyholder or insured of the insurer or beneficiaries of any self-insured health coverage arrangement administered by the insurer, to a qualified entity, as defined in Section 1395kk(e)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code. All disclosures of data made under this section shall comply with all applicable state and federal laws for the protection of the privacy and security of the data, including, but not limited to, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) and the federal Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act, Title XIII of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment
 Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), and implementing regulations.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152).

(2) “Provider” means a
 hospital, a skilled nursing facility, a comprehensive outpatient rehabilitation facility, a home health agency, a hospice, a clinic, or a rehabilitation agency.

(3) “Supplier” means a physician and surgeon or other health care practitioner, or an entity that furnishes health care services other than a provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 869, Sec. 3.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10118.

A policy of disability insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this state more than 120 days after the effective date of this section, that provides that coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the policy or contract, shall also provide in substance that attainment of the limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of the child while the child is and continues to be both (a) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of an intellectual disability or physical handicap and (b) chiefly dependent upon the insured for support and maintenance, provided proof of the incapacity and dependency is furnished to the insurer by the insured within 31 days of the child’s attainment
 of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the insurer, but not more frequently than annually after the two-year period following the child’s attainment of the limiting age.

Disability policies currently approved by the commissioner that are delivered or issued for delivery more than 120 days after the effective date of this section shall be automatically construed to be in compliance with this section and need not be refiled or reprinted. Disability policies submitted to the commissioner for approval on and after the effective date of this section shall contain provisions in compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 36.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.

On and after the operative date of this section:

(a) No policy of disability insurance which, in addition to covering the insured, also covers members of the insured’s immediate family, may be issued or amended in this state if it contains any disclaimer, waiver, or other limitation of coverage relative to the accident and sickness coverage or insurability of newborn infants of an insured from and after the moment of birth or of any minor child placed with an insured for adoption from and after the moment the child is placed in the physical custody of the insured for adoption.

(b) Each such policy of disability insurance shall contain a provision granting immediate accident and sickness coverage to each newborn infant of, and each minor child placed for adoption with, any insured as required by subdivision (a). 

(c) A policy of disability insurance, self-insured care coverage, employee welfare benefit plan, or nonprofit hospital service plan, shall comply with the standards set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3750) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Family Code and Section 14124.94 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1062, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.1.

(a) This section shall apply to a health insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses under an individual health benefit plan, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2007.

(b) At least once each year, a health insurer shall permit an individual who has been covered for at least 18 months under an individual health benefit plan to transfer, without medical underwriting, to any other individual health benefit plan offered by that same health insurer that provides equal or lesser benefits as determined by the insurer.

“Without medical underwriting”
 means that the health insurer shall not decline to offer coverage to, or deny enrollment of, the individual or impose any preexisting condition exclusion on the individual who transfers to another individual health benefit plan pursuant to this section.

(c) The insurer shall establish, for the purposes of subdivision (b), a ranking of the individual health benefit plans it offers to individual purchasers and post the ranking on its Internet Web site or make the ranking available upon request. The insurer shall update the ranking whenever a new benefit design for individual purchasers is approved.

(d) The insurer shall notify in writing all insureds of the right to transfer to another individual health benefit plan pursuant to this section, at a minimum, when the insurer changes the insured’s premium rate. Posting this information on the insurer’s Internet Web site shall not
 constitute notice for purposes of this subdivision. The notice shall adequately inform insureds of the transfer rights provided under this section including information on the process to obtain details about the individual health benefit plans available to that insured and advising that the insured may be unable to return to his or her current individual health benefit plan if the insured transfers to another individual health benefit plan.

(e) The requirements of this section shall not apply to the following:

(1) A federally eligible defined individual, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 10900, who purchases individual coverage pursuant to Section 10785.

(2) An individual offered conversion coverage pursuant to Sections 12672 and 12682.1.

(3) An
 individual enrolled in the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) An individual enrolled in the Access for Infants and Mothers Program, pursuant to Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695).

(5) An individual enrolled in the Healthy Families Program pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693).

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that individuals shall have more choice in their health care coverage when health insurers guarantee the right of an individual to transfer to another product based on the insurer’s own ranking system. The Legislature does not intend for the department to review or verify the insurer’s ranking for actuarial or other purposes.

(g) (1) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2014, or the 91st calendar day following the adjournment of the 2013–14 First Extraordinary Session, whichever date is later.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-4), this section shall become operative 12 months after the date of that repeal or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 3.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Inoperative, by its own provisions, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.2.

(a) Every health insurer that offers, issues, or renews health insurance under an individual health benefit plan, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, shall offer to any individual, who was covered under an individual health benefit plan that was rescinded, a new individual health benefit plan without medical underwriting that provides equal benefits. A health insurer may also permit an individual, who was covered under an individual health benefit plan that was rescinded, to remain covered under that individual health benefit plan, with a revised premium rate that reflects the number of persons remaining on the health benefit plan.

(b) “Without medical underwriting”
 means that the health insurer shall not decline to offer coverage to, or deny enrollment of, the individual or impose any preexisting condition exclusion on the individual who is issued a new individual health benefit plan or remains covered under an individual health benefit plan pursuant to this section.

(c) If a new individual health benefit plan is issued, the insurer may revise the premium rate to reflect only the number of persons covered under the new individual health benefit plan.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if an individual was subject to a preexisting condition provision or a waiting or affiliation period under the individual health benefit plan that was rescinded, the health insurer may apply the same preexisting condition provision or waiting or affiliation period in the new individual health benefit plan. The time period in the new individual health
 benefit plan for the preexisting condition provision or waiting or affiliation period shall not be longer than the one in the individual health benefit plan that was rescinded and the health insurer shall credit any time that the individual was covered under the rescinded individual health benefit plan.

(e) The insurer shall notify in writing all insureds of the right to coverage under an individual health benefit plan pursuant to this section, at a minimum, when the insurer rescinds the individual health benefit plan. The notice shall adequately inform insureds of the right to coverage provided under this section.

(f) The insurer shall provide 60 days for insureds to accept the offered new individual health benefit plan and this plan shall be effective as of the effective date of the original individual health benefit plan and there shall be no lapse in coverage.

(g) This section shall not apply to any individual whose information in the application for coverage and related communications led to the rescission.

(h) (1) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2014, or the 91st calendar day following the adjournment of the 2013–14 First Extraordinary Session, whichever date is later.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-4), this section shall become operative 12 months after the date of that repeal or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 4.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Inoperative, by its own provisions, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.   See later operative version added by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.2.

(a) Every health insurer that offers, issues, or renews health insurance under an individual health benefit plan, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, shall offer to any individual, who was covered by the insurer under an individual health benefit plan that was rescinded, a new individual health benefit plan that provides the most equivalent benefits.

(b) A health insurer that offers, issues, or renews individual health benefit plans inside or outside the California Health Benefit Exchange may also permit an individual, who was covered by the insurer under an individual health benefit plan that was rescinded, to remain covered under that individual health benefit plan, with a revised
 premium rate that reflects the number of persons remaining on the health benefit plan consistent with Section 10965.9.

(c) If a new individual health benefit plan is issued under subdivision (a), the insurer may revise the premium rate to reflect only the number of persons covered on the new individual health benefit plan consistent with Section 10965.9.

(d) The insurer shall notify in writing all insureds of the right to coverage under an individual health benefit plan pursuant to this section, at a minimum, when the insurer rescinds the individual health benefit plan. The notice shall adequately inform insureds of the right to coverage provided under this section.

(e) The insurer shall provide 60 days for insureds to accept the offered new individual health benefit plan under subdivision (a), and this plan shall be
 effective as of the effective date of the original health benefit plan and there shall be no lapse in coverage.

(f) This section shall not apply to any individual whose information in the application for coverage and related communications led to the rescission.

(g) This section shall apply notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 10965.3.

(h) (1) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014, or the 91st calendar day following the adjournment of the 2013–14 First Extraordinary Session, whichever date is later.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public
 Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-4), this section shall become inoperative 12 months after the date of that repeal or amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Upon inoperation, see the previous version, as amended by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1, which would resume operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an agent or broker who assists an applicant in submitting an application to a health insurer has the duty to assist the applicant in providing answers to health questions accurately and completely.

(b) An agent or broker who assists an applicant in submitting an application to a health insurer shall attest on the written application to both of the following:

(1) That to the best of his or her knowledge, the information on the application is complete and accurate.

(2) That he or she explained to the applicant, in easy-to-understand language, the risk to the applicant of providing inaccurate information and that the applicant understood the explanation.

(c) If, in an attestation required by subdivision (b), a declarant willfully states as true any material fact he or she knows to be false, that person shall, in addition to any applicable penalties or remedies available under current law, be subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Any public prosecutor may bring a civil action to impose that civil penalty. These penalties shall be paid to the Insurance Fund.

(d) A health insurance application shall include a statement advising declarants of the civil penalty authorized under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.5.

(a) No individual or group policy of health insurance that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after July 1, 2003, that provides maternity coverage shall contain a copayment or deductible for inpatient hospital maternity services that exceeds the most common amount of the copayment or deductible contained in the policy for inpatient services provided for other covered medical conditions or contain a copayment or deductible for ambulatory care maternity services that exceeds the most common amount of the copayment or deductible contained in the policy for ambulatory care services provided for other covered medical conditions.

(b) No group or blanket policy of health insurance that provides maternity benefits for a person covered continuously from conception shall be issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state if it contains any exclusion, reduction, or other limitations as to coverage, deductibles, or coinsurance provisions, as to involuntary complications of pregnancy, unless the provisions apply generally to all benefits paid under the policy.

(c) For purposes of this section, involuntary complications of pregnancy shall include, but not be limited to, puerperal infection, eclampsia, cesarean section delivery, ectopic pregnancy, and toxemia.

(d) This section shall not apply to Medicare supplement, vision-only, or Champus-supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, accident-only, and specified disease insurance that does not pay benefits on a fixed benefit, cash payment only basis.

(e) This section shall not permit copayments or deductibles in the Medi-Cal program that are not otherwise authorized under state or federal law.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2003.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 880, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative July 1, 2003, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.6.

(a) (1) A large group health insurance policy that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility and fertility services, including a maximum of three completed oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers in accordance with the guidelines of the American Society for Reproductive Medicine (ASRM), using single embryo transfer when recommended and medically appropriate.

(2) A small group health insurance policy that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, shall offer coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility and fertility services. This paragraph shall not be construed to require a small group health insurance policy to
 provide coverage for infertility services.

(3) A health insurer shall include notice of the coverage specified in this section in the insurer’s evidence of coverage.

(4) This section shall not apply to Medicare supplement or specialized health insurance policies.

(b) For purposes of this section, “infertility” means a condition or status characterized by any of the following:

(1) A licensed physician’s findings, based on a patient’s medical, sexual, and reproductive history, age, physical findings, diagnostic testing, or any combination of those factors. This definition shall not prevent testing and diagnosis before the 12-month or 6-month period to establish infertility in paragraph (3).

(2) A person’s inability to reproduce either as an individual or with their partner without medical intervention.

(3) The failure to establish a pregnancy or to carry a pregnancy to live birth after regular, unprotected sexual intercourse. For purposes of this section, “regular, unprotected sexual intercourse” means no more than 12 months of unprotected sexual intercourse for a person under 35 years of age or no more than 6 months of unprotected sexual intercourse for a person 35 years of age or older. Pregnancy resulting in miscarriage does not restart the 12-month or 6-month time period to qualify as having infertility.

(c) The policy may not include any of the following:

(1) Any exclusion, limitation, or other restriction on coverage of fertility medications that are different from those imposed on
 other prescription medications.

(2) Any exclusion or denial of coverage of any fertility services based on a covered individual’s participation in fertility services provided by or to a third party. For purposes of this section, “third party” includes an oocyte, sperm, or embryo donor, gestational carrier, or surrogate that enables an intended recipient to become a parent.

(3) Any deductible, copayment, coinsurance, benefit maximum, waiting period, or any other limitation on coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility, except as provided in subdivision (a) that are different from those imposed upon benefits for services not related to infertility.

(d) This section does not in any way deny or restrict any existing right or benefit to coverage and treatment of infertility or fertility services under an
 existing law, plan, or policy.

(e) This section applies to every health insurance policy that is issued, amended, or renewed to residents of this state regardless of the situs of the contract.

(f) Consistent with Section 10140, coverage for the treatment of infertility and fertility services shall be provided without discrimination on the basis of age, ancestry, color, disability, domestic partner status, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information, marital status, national origin, race, religion, sex, or sexual orientation. This subdivision shall not be construed to interfere with the clinical judgment of a physician and surgeon.

(g) This section shall not apply to a religious employer, as defined in Section 10123.196.

(h) This